Hawaii statutes.
Limited
Liability Partnerships

§425-151 Name. The name of a limited
liability partnership shall contain "Registered Limited Liability
Partnership" or "Limited Liability Partnership", or the
abbreviation "R.L.L.P.", "L.L.P.", "RLLP", or
"LLP". [L 2000, c 218, pr of §1; am L 2001, c 241, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next